California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the magistrate may, upon motion of the prosecutor, close the examination in the manner described in Section 868 during the testimony of a witness:

(1) Who is a minor or a dependent person, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 288, with a substantial cognitive impairment and is the complaining victim of a sex offense, where testimony before the general public would be likely to cause serious psychological harm to the witness and where no alternative procedures, including, but not limited to, video recorded deposition or contemporaneous examination in another place communicated to the courtroom by means of closed-circuit television, are available to avoid the
 perceived harm.

(2) Whose life would be subject to a substantial risk in appearing before the general public, and where no alternative security measures, including, but not limited to, efforts to conceal his or her features or physical description, searches of members of the public attending the examination, or the temporary exclusion of other actual or potential witnesses, would be adequate to minimize the perceived threat.

(b) In any case where public access to the courtroom is restricted during the examination of a witness pursuant to this section, a transcript of the testimony of the witness shall be made available to the public as soon as is practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 73.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

868.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any criminal proceeding in which the defendant is charged with a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (b) of Section 209, Section 220, 236.1, 243.4, 261, 269, 273a, 273d, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 288.7, or 289, subdivision (1) of Section 314, Section 422, 646.9, 647.6, or former Section 288a or 647a, or any crime that constitutes domestic violence defined in Section 13700, committed with or upon a person with a disability or a minor under 11 years of age, the court shall take special precautions to provide for the comfort and support of the person with a disability or minor and to protect him or her from
 coercion, intimidation, or undue influence as a witness, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(a) In the court’s discretion, the witness may be allowed reasonable periods of relief from examination and cross-examination during which he or she may retire from the courtroom. The judge may also allow other witnesses in the proceeding to be examined when the person with a disability or child witness retires from the courtroom.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 68110 of the Government Code, in his or her discretion, the judge may remove his or her robe if the judge believes that this formal attire intimidates the person with a disability or the minor.

(c) In the court’s discretion the judge, parties,
 witnesses, support persons, and court personnel may be relocated within the courtroom to facilitate a more comfortable and personal environment for the person with a disability or the child witness.

(d) In the court’s discretion, the taking of the testimony of the person with a disability or the minor may be limited to normal school hours if there is no good cause to take the testimony of the person with a disability or the minor during other hours.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the term “disability” is defined in subdivision (j) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 81.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

869.

The testimony of each witness in cases of homicide shall be reduced to writing, as a deposition, by the magistrate, or under his or her direction, and in other cases upon the demand of the prosecuting attorney, or the defendant, or his or her counsel. The magistrate before whom the examination is had may, in his or her discretion, order the testimony and proceedings to be taken down in shorthand in all examinations herein mentioned, and for that purpose he or she may appoint a shorthand reporter. The deposition or testimony of the witness shall be authenticated in the following form:

(a) It shall state the name of the witness, his or her place of residence, and his or her business or profession; except that if the witness is a peace officer, it shall state his or her name, and the address given in his or her testimony at the hearing.

(b) It shall contain the questions put to the witness and his or her answers thereto, each answer being distinctly read to him or her as it is taken down, and being corrected or added to until it conforms to what he or she declares is the truth, except in cases where the testimony is taken down in shorthand, the answer or answers of the witness need not be read to him or her.

(c) If a question put be objected to on either side and overruled, or the witness declines answering it, that fact, with the ground on which the question was overruled or the answer declined, shall be stated.

(d) The deposition shall be signed by the witness, or if he or she refuses to sign it, his or her reason for refusing shall be stated in writing, as he or she gives it, except in cases where the deposition is taken down in shorthand, it need not be signed by the witness.

(e) The reporter shall, within 10 days after the close of the examination, if the defendant be held to answer the charge of a felony, or in any other case if either the defendant or the prosecution orders the transcript, transcribe his or her shorthand notes, making an original and one copy and as many additional copies thereof as there are defendants (other than fictitious defendants), regardless of the number of charges or fictitious defendants included in the same examination, and certify and deliver the original and all copies to the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the defendant was examined. The reporter shall, before receiving any compensation as a reporter, file his or her affidavit setting forth that the transcript has been delivered within the time herein provided for. The compensation of the reporter for any services rendered by him or her as the reporter in any court of this state shall be reduced one-half if the provisions of this section as to the time of filing said transcript have not been complied with by him or her.

(f) In every case in which a transcript is delivered as provided in this section, the clerk of the court shall file the original of the transcript with the papers in the case, and shall deliver a copy of the transcript to the district attorney immediately upon his or her receipt thereof and shall deliver a copy of said transcript to each defendant (other than a fictitious defendant) at least five days before trial or upon earlier demand by him or her without cost to him or her; provided, that if any defendant be held to answer to two or more charges upon the same examination and thereafter the district attorney shall file separate informations upon said several charges, the delivery to each such defendant of one copy of the transcript of the examination shall be a compliance with this section as to all of those informations.

(g) If the transcript is delivered by the reporter within the time hereinbefore provided for, the reporter shall be entitled to receive the compensation fixed and allowed by law to reporters in the superior courts of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 534.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

870.

The magistrate or his or her clerk shall keep the depositions taken on the information or the examination, until they are returned to the proper court; and shall not permit them to be examined or copied by any person except a judge of a court having jurisdiction of the offense, or authorized to issue writs of habeas corpus, the Attorney General, district attorney, or other prosecuting attorney, and the defendant and his or her counsel; provided however, upon demand by the defendant or his or her attorney the magistrate shall order a transcript of the depositions taken on the information, or on the examination, to be immediately furnished the defendant or his or her attorney, after the commitment of the defendant as provided by Sections 876 and 877, and the reporter furnishing the depositions, shall receive compensation in accordance with Section 869.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 535.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

871.

If, after hearing the proofs, it appears either that no public offense has been committed or that there is not sufficient cause to believe the defendant guilty of a public offense, the magistrate shall order the complaint dismissed and the defendant to be discharged, by an indorsement on the depositions and statement, signed by the magistrate, to the following effect: “There being no sufficient cause to believe the within named A. B. guilty of the offense within mentioned, I order that the complaint be dismissed and that he or she shall be discharged.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 938, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

871.5.

(a) When an action is dismissed by a magistrate pursuant to Section 859b, 861, 871, 1008, 1381, 1381.5, 1385, 1387, or 1389 of this code or Section 41403 of the Vehicle Code, or a portion thereof is dismissed pursuant to those same sections which may not be charged by information under Section 739, the prosecutor may make a motion in the superior court within 15 days to compel the magistrate to reinstate the complaint or a portion thereof and to reinstate the custodial status of the defendant under the same terms and conditions as when the defendant last appeared before the magistrate.

(b) Notice of the motion shall be made to the defendant and the magistrate. The only ground for the motion shall be that, as a matter of law, the magistrate erroneously dismissed the action or a portion thereof.

(c) The superior court shall hear and determine the motion on the basis of the record of the proceedings before the magistrate. If the motion is litigated to decision by the prosecutor, the prosecution is prohibited from refiling the dismissed action, or portion thereof.

(d) Within 10 days after the magistrate has dismissed the action or a portion thereof, the prosecuting attorney may file a written request for a transcript of the proceedings with the clerk of the magistrate. The reporter shall immediately transcribe his or her shorthand notes pursuant to Section 869 and file with the clerk of the superior court an original plus one copy, and as many copies as there are defendants (other than a fictitious defendant). The reporter shall be entitled to compensation in accordance with Section 869. The clerk of the superior court shall deliver a copy of the transcript to the prosecuting attorney immediately upon its receipt and shall deliver a copy of the transcript to each defendant (other than a fictitious defendant) upon his or her demand without cost.

(e) When a court has ordered the resumption of proceedings before the magistrate, the magistrate shall resume the proceedings and when so ordered, issue an order of commitment for the reinstated offense or offenses within 10 days after the superior court has entered an order to that effect or within 10 days after the remittitur is filed in the superior court. Upon receipt of the remittitur, the superior court shall forward a copy to the magistrate.

(f) Pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 1238 the people may take an appeal from the denial of the motion by the superior court to reinstate the complaint or a portion thereof. If the motion to reinstate the complaint is granted, the defendant may seek review thereof only pursuant to Sections 995 and 999a. That review may only be sought in the event the defendant is held to answer pursuant to Section 872.

(g) Nothing contained herein shall preclude a magistrate, upon the resumption of proceedings, from considering a motion made pursuant to Section 1318.

If the superior court grants the motion for reinstatement and orders the magistrate to issue an order of commitment, the defendant, in lieu of resumed proceedings before the magistrate, may elect to waive his or her right to be committed by a magistrate, and consent to the filing of an amended or initial information containing the reinstated charge or charges. After arraignment thereon, he or she may adopt as a motion pursuant to Section 995, the record and proceedings of the motion taken pursuant to this section and the order issued pursuant thereto, and may seek review of the order in the manner prescribed in Section 999a.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

871.6.

If in a felony case the magistrate sets the preliminary examination beyond the time specified in Section 859b, in violation of Section 859b, or continues the preliminary hearing without good cause and good cause is required by law for such a continuance, the people or the defendant may file a petition for writ of mandate or prohibition in the superior court seeking immediate appellate review of the ruling setting the hearing or granting the continuance. Such a petition shall have precedence over all other cases in the court to which the petition is assigned. If the superior court grants a peremptory writ, it shall issue the writ and a remittitur three court days after its decision becomes final as to the court if this action is necessary to prevent mootness or to prevent frustration of the relief granted, notwithstanding the rights of the parties to seek review in a court of appeal. When the superior court issues the writ and remittitur as provided in this section, the writ shall command the magistrate to proceed with the preliminary hearing without further delay, other than that reasonably necessary for the parties to obtain the attendance of their witnesses.

The court of appeal may stay or recall the issuance of the writ and remittitur. The failure of the court of appeal to stay or recall the issuance of the writ and remittitur shall not deprive the parties of any right they would otherwise have to appellate review or extraordinary relief.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

872.

(a) If, however, it appears from the examination that a public offense has been committed, and there is sufficient cause to believe that the defendant is guilty, the magistrate shall make or indorse on the complaint an order, signed by him or her, to the following effect: “It appearing to me that the offense in the within complaint mentioned (or any offense, according to the fact, stating generally the nature thereof), has been committed, and that there is sufficient cause to believe that the within named A.B. is guilty, I order that he or she be held to answer to the same.”

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1200 of the Evidence Code, the finding of probable cause may be based in whole or in part upon the
 sworn testimony of a law enforcement officer or honorably retired law enforcement officer relating the statements of declarants made out of court offered for the truth of the matter asserted. An honorably retired law enforcement officer may only relate statements of declarants made out of court and offered for the truth of the matter asserted that were made when the honorably retired officer was an active law enforcement officer. Any law enforcement officer or honorably retired law enforcement officer testifying as to hearsay statements shall either have five years of law enforcement experience or have completed a training course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training that includes training in the investigation and reporting of cases and testifying at preliminary hearings.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (b), a law enforcement officer
 is any officer or agent employed by a federal, state, or local government agency to whom all of the following apply:

(1) Has either five years of law enforcement experience or who has completed a training course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training that includes training in the investigation and reporting of cases and testifying at preliminary hearings.

(2) Whose primary responsibility is the enforcement of any law, the
 detection and apprehension of persons who have violated any law, or the investigation and preparation for prosecution of cases involving violation of laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   (AB 568)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section was amended on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 115.)
-------------------------------------------

872.5.

Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 1520) of Chapter 2 of Division 11 of the Evidence Code, in a preliminary examination the content of a writing may be proved by an otherwise admissible original or otherwise admissible secondary evidence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 100, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

873.

If the offense is not bailable, the following words must be added to the indorsement: “And he is hereby committed to the Sheriff of the County of ____. ”

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

875.

If the offense is bailable, and the defendant is admitted to bail, the following words must be added to the order, “and that he be admitted to bail in the sum of ____ dollars, and is committed to the Sheriff of the County of ____ until he gives such bail.”

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

876.

If the magistrate order the defendant to be committed, he must make out a commitment, signed by him, with his name of office, and deliver it, with the defendant, to the officer to whom he is committed, or, if that officer is not present, to a peace officer, who must deliver the defendant into the proper custody, together with the commitment.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

877.

The commitment must be to the following effect except when it is made under the provisions of section 859a of this code.

County of ____ (as the case may be).

The people of the State of California to the sheriff of the county of ____:

An order having been this day made by me, that A.B. be held to answer upon a charge of (stating briefly the nature of the offense, and giving as near as may be the time when and the place where the same was committed), you are commanded to receive him into your custody and detain him until he is legally discharged. 

Dated this ____ day of ____ nineteen ____.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

877a.

When the commitment is made under the provisions of section 859a of this code, it must be made to the following effect:

County of ____ (as the case may be).

The people of the State of California to the sheriff of the county of ____.

A.B. having pleaded guilty to the offense of (stating briefly the nature of the offense, and giving as near as may be the time when and the place where the same was committed), you are commanded to receive him into your custody and detain him until he is legally discharged.

Dated this ____ day of ____ nineteen ____.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

878.

On holding the defendant to answer or on a plea of guilty where permitted by law, the magistrate may take from each of the material witnesses examined before him on the part of the people a written undertaking, to the effect that he will appear and testify at the court to which the depositions and statements or case are to be sent, or that he will forfeit the sum of five hundred dollars.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

879.

When the magistrate or a Judge of the Court in which the action is pending is satisfied, by proof on oath, that there is reason to believe that any such witness will not appear and testify unless security is required, he may order the witness to enter into a written undertaking, with sureties, in such sum as he may deem proper, for his appearance as specified in the preceding section.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

880.

Infants who are material witnesses against the defendant may be required to procure sureties for their appearance, as provided in the last section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

881.

(a) If a witness, required to enter into an undertaking to appear and testify, either with or without sureties, refuses compliance with the order for that purpose, the magistrate shall commit him or her to prison until he or she complies or is legally discharged.

(b) If a witness fails to appear at the preliminary hearing in response to a subpoena, the court may hear evidence, including testimony or an affidavit from the arresting or interviewing officer, and if the court determines on the basis of the evidence that the witness is a material witness, the court shall issue a bench warrant for the arrest of the witness, and upon the appearance of the witness, may commit him or her into custody until the conclusion of the preliminary hearing, or until the defendant enters a plea of nolo contendere, or the witness is otherwise legally discharged.

The court may order the witness to enter into a written undertaking to the effect that he or she will appear and testify at the time and place ordered by the court or that he or she will forfeit an amount that the court deems proper.

(c) Once the material witness has been taken into custody on the bench warrant he or she shall be brought before the magistrate issuing the warrant, if available, within two court days for a hearing to determine if the witness should be released on security of appearance or maintained in custody.

(d) A material witness shall remain in custody under this section for no longer than 10 days.

(e) If a material witness is being held in custody under this section the prosecution is entitled to have the preliminary hearing proceed, as to this witness only, within 10 days of the arraignment of the defendant. Once this material witness has completed his or her testimony the defendant shall be entitled to a reasonable continuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

882.

When, however, it satisfactorily appears by examination, on oath of the witness, or any other person, that the witness is unable to procure sureties, he or she may be forthwith conditionally examined on behalf of the people. The examination shall be by question and answer, in the presence of the defendant, or after notice to him or her, if on bail, and conducted in the same manner as the examination before a committing magistrate is required by this code to be conducted, and the witness thereupon discharged; and the deposition may be used upon the trial of the defendant, except in cases of homicide, under the same conditions as mentioned in Section 1345; but this section does not apply to an accomplice in the commission of the offense charged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

883.

When a magistrate has discharged a defendant, or has held him to answer, he must return, without delay, to the Clerk of the Court at which the defendant is required to appear, the warrant, if any, the depositions, and all undertakings of bail, or for the appearance of witnesses taken by him.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4. GRAND JURY PROCEEDINGS [888. - 939.91.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [888. - 892.]

888.

A grand jury is a body of the required number of persons returned from the citizens of the county before a court of competent jurisdiction, and sworn to inquire of public offenses committed or triable within the county.

Each grand jury or, if more than one has been duly impaneled pursuant to Sections 904.4 to 904.8, inclusive, one grand jury in each county, shall be charged and sworn to investigate or inquire into county matters of civil concern, such as the needs of county officers, including the abolition or creation of offices for, the purchase, lease, or sale of equipment for, or changes in the method or system of, performing the duties of the agencies subject to investigation pursuant to Section 914.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 157.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

888.2.

As used in this title as applied to a grand jury, “required number” means:

(a) Twenty-three in a county having a population exceeding 4,000,000.

(b) Eleven in a county having a population of 20,000 or less, upon the approval of the board of supervisors.

(c) Nineteen in all other counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 295, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

889.

An indictment is an accusation in writing, presented by the grand jury to a competent court, charging a person with a public offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

890.

Unless a higher fee or rate of mileage is otherwise provided by statute or county or city and county ordinance, the fees for grand jurors are fifteen dollars ($15) a day for each day’s attendance as a grand juror, and the mileage reimbursement applicable to county employees for each mile actually traveled in attending court as a grand juror.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Operative July 1, 2002, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 218.)
-------------------------------------------

890.1.

The per diem and mileage of grand jurors where allowed by law shall be paid by the treasurer of the county out of the general fund of the county upon warrants drawn by the county auditor upon the written order of the judge of the superior court of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

891.

Every person who, by any means whatsoever, willfully and knowingly, and without knowledge and consent of the grand jury, records, or attempts to record, all or part of the proceedings of any grand jury while it is deliberating or voting, or listens to or observes, or attempts to listen to or observe, the proceedings of any grand jury of which he is not a member while such jury is deliberating or voting is guilty of a misdemeanor.

This section is not intended to prohibit the taking of notes by a grand juror in connection with and solely for the purpose of assisting him in the performance of his duties as such juror.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

892.

The grand jury may proceed against a corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 249.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of Grand Jury [893. - 913.]



  ARTICLE 1. Qualifications of Grand Jurors [893. - 894.]

893.

(a) A person is competent to act as a grand juror only if he possesses each of the following qualifications:

(1) He is a citizen of the United States of the age of 18 years or older who shall have been a resident of the state and of the county or city and county for one year immediately before being selected and returned.

(2) He is in possession of his natural faculties, of ordinary intelligence, of sound judgment, and of fair character.

(3) He is possessed of sufficient knowledge of the English language.

(b) A person is not competent to act as a grand juror if any of the following apply:

(1) The person is serving as a trial juror in any court of this state.

(2) The person has been discharged as a grand juror in any court of this state within one year.

(3) The person has been convicted of malfeasance in office or any felony or other high crime.

(4) The person is serving as an elected public officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

894.

Sections 204, 218, and 219 of the Code of Civil Procedure specify the exemptions and the excuses which relieve a person from liability to serve as a grand juror.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1416, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Listing and Selection of Grand Jurors [895. - 902.]

895.

During the month preceding the beginning of the fiscal year of the county, the superior court of each county shall make an order designating the estimated number of grand jurors that will, in the opinion of the court, be required for the transaction of the business of the court during the ensuing fiscal year as provided in Section 905.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

896.

(a) Immediately after an order is made pursuant to Section 895, the court shall select the grand jurors required by personal interview for the purpose of ascertaining whether they possess the qualifications prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 893. If a person so interviewed, in the opinion of the court, possesses the necessary qualifications, in order to be listed the person shall sign a statement declaring that the person will be available for jury service for the number of hours usually required of a member of the grand jury in that county.

(b) The selections shall be made of men and women who are not exempt from serving and who are suitable and competent to serve as grand jurors pursuant to Sections 893, 898, and 899. The court shall list the persons so selected and required by the order to serve as grand jurors during the ensuing fiscal year of the county, or until a new list of grand jurors is provided, and shall at once place this list in the possession of the jury commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

898.

The list of grand jurors made in a county having a population in excess of four million shall contain the number of persons which has been designated by the court in its order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 259.)
-------------------------------------------

899.

The names for the grand jury list shall be selected from the different wards, judicial districts, or supervisorial districts of the respective counties in proportion to the number of inhabitants therein, as nearly as the same can be estimated by the persons making the lists. The grand jury list shall be kept separate and distinct from the trial jury list. In a county of the first class, the names for such list may be selected from the county at large.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

900.

On receiving the list of persons selected by the court, the jury commissioner shall file it in the jury commissioner’s office and have the list, which shall include the name of the judge who selected each person on the list, published one time in a newspaper of general circulation, as defined in Section 6000 of the Government Code, in the county. The jury commissioner shall then do either of the following:

(a) Write down the names on the list onto separate pieces of paper of the same size and appearance, fold each piece so as to conceal the name, and deposit the pieces in a box to be called the “grand jury box.”

(b) Assign a number to each name on the list and place, in a box to be called the “grand jury box,” markers of the same size, shape, and color, each containing a number which corresponds with a number on the list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

901.

(a) The persons whose names are so returned shall be known as regular jurors, and shall serve for one year and until other persons are selected and returned.

(b) If the superior court so decides, the presiding judge may name up to 10 regular jurors not previously so named, who served on the previous grand jury and who so consent, to serve for a second year.

(c) The court may also decide to select grand jurors pursuant to Section 908.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 886, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

902.

The names of persons drawn for grand jurors shall be drawn from the grand jury box by withdrawing either the pieces of paper placed therein pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 900 or the markers placed therein pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 900. If, at the end of the fiscal year of the county, there are the names of persons in the grand jury box who have not been drawn during the fiscal year to serve and have not served as grand jurors, the names of such persons may be placed on the list of grand jurors drawn for the succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Jury Commissioners [903.1. - 903.4.]

903.1.

Pursuant to written rules or instructions adopted by a majority of the judges of the superior court of the county, the jury commissioner shall furnish the judges of the court annually a list of persons qualified to serve as grand jurors during the ensuing fiscal year of the county, or until a new list of jurors is required. From time to time, a majority of the judges of the superior court may adopt such rules or instructions as may be necessary for the guidance of the jury commissioner, who shall at all times be under the supervision and control of the judges of the court. Any list of jurors prepared pursuant to this article must, however, meet the requirements of Section
 899.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

903.2.

The jury commissioner shall diligently inquire and inform himself or herself in respect to the qualifications of persons resident in his or her county who may be liable to be summoned for grand jury duty. He or she may require a person to answer, under oath to be administered by him or her, all questions as he or she may address to that person, touching his or her name, age, residence, occupation, and qualifications as a grand juror, and also all questions as to similar matters concerning other persons of whose qualifications for grand jury duty he or she has
 knowledge.

The commissioner and his or her assistants, referred to in Sections 69895 and 69896 of the Government Code, shall have the power to administer oaths and shall be allowed actual traveling expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Those traveling expenses shall be audited, allowed, and paid out of the general fund of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 179.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

903.3.

Pursuant to the rules or instructions adopted by a majority of the judges of the superior court, the jury commissioner shall return to the judges the list of persons recommended by him for grand jury duty. The judges of the superior court shall examine the jury list so returned and from such list a majority of the judges may select, to serve as grand jurors in the superior court of the county during the ensuing year or until a new list of jurors is required, such persons as, in their opinion, should be selected for grand jury duty. The persons so selected shall, in the opinion of the judges selecting them, be persons suitable and competent to serve as jurors, as required by
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

903.4.

The judges are not required to select any name from the list returned by the jury commissioner, but may, if in their judgment the due administration of justice requires, make every or any selection from among the body of persons in the county suitable and competent to serve as grand jurors regardless of the list returned by the jury commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 214.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Impaneling of Grand Jury [904. - 913.]

904.

Every superior court, whenever in its opinion the public interest so requires, shall make and file with the jury commissioner an order directing a grand jury to be drawn. The order shall designate the number of grand jurors to be drawn, which may not be less than 29 nor more than 40 in counties having a population exceeding four million and not less than 25 nor more than 30 in other counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

904.4.

(a) In any county having a population of more than 370,000 but less than 400,000 as established by Section 28020 of the Government Code, the presiding judge of the superior court, upon application by the district attorney, may order and direct the drawing and impanelment at any time of one additional grand jury. 

(b) The presiding judge may select persons, at random, from the list of trial jurors in civil and criminal cases and shall examine them to determine if they are competent to serve as grand jurors. When a sufficient number of competent persons have been selected, they shall constitute the additional grand jury. 

(c) Any additional grand jury which is impaneled pursuant to this section may serve for a period of one year from the date of impanelment, but may be discharged at any time within the one-year period by order of the presiding judge. In no event shall more than one additional grand jury be impaneled pursuant to this section at the same time. 

(d) Whenever an additional grand jury is impaneled pursuant to this section, it may inquire into any matters that are subject to grand jury inquiry and shall have the sole and exclusive jurisdiction to return indictments, except for any matters that the regular grand jury is inquiring into at the time of its impanelment. 

(e) If an additional grand jury is also authorized by another section, the county may impanel the additional grand jury authorized by this section, or by the other section, but not both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1109, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

904.6.

(a) In any county or city and county, the presiding judge of the superior court, or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury, may, upon the request of the Attorney General or the district attorney or upon his or her own motion, order and direct the impanelment, of one additional grand jury pursuant to this section.

(b) The presiding judge or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury shall select persons, at random, from the list of trial jurors in civil and criminal cases and shall examine them to determine if they are competent to serve as grand jurors. When a sufficient number of competent persons have been selected, they shall constitute the additional grand jury.
